New York, session 2025-2026, A9588.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The banking law is amended by adding a new section 9-aa to 2 read as follows: 3 § 9-aa. Fees for certain mortgage payments prohibited. 1. For the 4 purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following 5 meanings: 6 (a) "Mortgage payment servicer" shall mean a mortgage loan servicer as 7 defined in section five hundred ninety of this chapter, any banking 8 organization, a licensed mortgage banker pursuant to article twelve-D of 9 this chapter, an interstate branch established pursuant to article 10 five-C of this chapter, or other person or entity, to the extent such 11 person or entity, directly or indirectly, services, administers, or 12 processes payments on a mortgage loan. Such term shall not include any 13 national bank, federal savings bank, federal savings and loan asso- 14 ciation, federal credit union, or any entity chartered or licensed by 15 the United States; 16 (b) "Monthly" shall mean once per calendar month; 17 (c) "Semi-monthly" shall mean twice per calendar month; and 18 (d) "Biweekly" shall mean once every fourteen days. 19 2. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule or regu- 20 lation to the contrary, no mortgage payment servicer shall, directly or 21 indirectly, charge a fee or other charge to a mortgagor for making 22 payments on a mortgage loan on a monthly, semi-monthly, or biweekly 23 schedule. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13935-05-6 A. 9588--B 2 1 (b) Such prohibited fees or other charges shall include, but not be 2 limited to: 3 (i) additional costs, payments, fees, penalties, or premiums for 4 changing between monthly, semi-monthly, and biweekly mortgage payment 5 plans; and 6 (ii) payment of an additional principal or interest payment on a mort- 7 gage, or any part thereof, as a condition for changing a mortgage 8 payment schedule, except to the extent necessary to align the mortgage 9 with the new payment schedule. 10 3. (a) No mortgage payment servicer shall prohibit a mortgagor from 11 electing to pay a mortgage on a monthly, semi-monthly, or biweekly sche- 12 dule. A mortgage payment servicer shall permit a mortgagor to change the 13 frequency of such mortgagor's mortgage payments among such payment sche- 14 dules. 15 (b) A mortgage payment servicer may require reasonable adjustments 16 that are necessary to implement a change in payment schedule, including 17 adjustments to align payment due dates or escrow obligations; provided 18 that such adjustments are not used to evade or unreasonably restrict the 19 requirements of this section. 20 4. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule or regu- 21 lation to the contrary, each mortgage payment servicer shall, upon 22 request of a mortgagor, provide such mortgagor with an amortization 23 schedule and an estimate of potential interest savings if such mortgagor 24 were to choose a monthly, semi-monthly, or biweekly mortgage payment 25 schedule and information on how to change to a different payment sched- 26 ule. 27 (b) (i) The superintendent shall prescribe by regulation a standard- 28 ized written notice to be provided to mortgagors informing them of their 29 rights under this section, including, but not limited to, the right to 30 elect and change the frequency of mortgage payments among monthly, semi- 31 monthly, and biweekly payment schedules, and the prohibition on fees or 32 other charges for such election or change. 33 (ii) Each mortgage payment servicer shall provide such notice to a 34 mortgagor at the time a mortgage is originated or first serviced by such 35 mortgage payment servicer and upon request of a mortgagor. 36 (iii) The superintendent may prescribe the form, manner, and timing of 37 such notice, including whether such notice may be provided electron- 38 ically. 39 5. If any provision of this section or its application to any person 40 or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other 41 provisions or application of this section which can be given effect 42 without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the 43 provisions of this section are severable. 44 6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any person or 45 entity to act in a manner inconsistent with federal law or regulation, 46 and to the extent of any conflict, federal law shall control. 47 7. A violation of this section shall constitute a violation of this 48 chapter and shall be subject to all penalties and remedies available to 49 the superintendent pursuant to this chapter and any other applicable 50 law. 51 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 52 it shall have become a law and shall apply to mortgage loans serviced on 53 or after such effective date.